Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-1182
Livestock sold;
treatment by veterinarians; release; documentation; rules and regulations.

Any livestock sold or disposed of at a livestock auction
market, before removal therefrom, shall be released by the designated veterinarian
and treated to conform with the health requirements of the rules and regulations
prescribed by the department for the movement
of livestock. When required, the designated veterinarian shall furnish each
owner with documentation showing such inspection, treatment, or quarantine.
No such livestock for interstate or intrastate shipment shall be released
until all the requirements of the state of its destination have been complied
with. Any diseased or exposed livestock shall be handled in accordance with
the rules and regulations as prescribed by the department.

Laws 1963, c. 319, § 26, p. 972;

Laws 1965, c. 334, § 7, p. 957;

Laws 1999, LB 778, § 75;

Laws 2001, LB 197, § 22;

Laws 2003, LB 160, § 8;

Laws 2014, LB884, § 32.